Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.251

Removal of directors—No quorum.

If at any time because of the removal of one or more credit union directors under this chapter, the board of directors of a credit union has less than a quorum of directors, all powers and functions vested in or exercisable by the board vest in and are exercisable by the director or directors remaining until such a time as there is a quorum on the board of directors. If all of the directors of a credit union are removed under this chapter, the director of the department of financial institutions shall appoint persons to serve temporarily as directors of the credit union until such a time as their respective successors take office.

[ 2010 c 87 s 19.]